District of Columbia statutes.
3-421

Services requiring immediate supervision by a funeral director.

An apprentice funeral director shall not perform the following services unless he or she is under the immediate supervision of a licensed funeral director:

(1)

The handling, preparation, or embalming of human remains;

(2)

The removal or transport of human remains;

(3)

Conducting or directing a funeral; or

(4)

Advising consumers making arrangements for the care and disposition of human remains, including arrangements made prior to the death of a person.

History

May 22, 1984, D.C. Law 5-84, § 22b
as added Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2082(e), 57 DCR 6242

Cross References

Licensure, non-health related occupations and professions, see § 47-2853.04.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2082(e) of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).